Utah statutes.
11-13-311.   Credit for impact alleviation payments against in lieu of ad
valorem property taxes -- Federal or state assistance.
(1)  In consideration of the impact alleviation payments and means provided by
the project entity or other public agency pursuant to the contracts and
determination orders, the project entity or other public agency, as the case
may be, shall be entitled to a credit against the fees paid in lieu of ad
valorem property taxes as provided by Section 11-13-302, ad valorem property
or other taxation by, or other payments in lieu of ad valorem property
taxation or other form of tax equivalent payments required by any candidate
which is a party to an impact alleviation contract or board order.
(2)  Each candidate may make application to any federal or state governmental
authority for any assistance that may be available from that authority to
alleviate the impacts to the candidate.  To the extent that the impact was
attributable to the project or to the facilities providing additional project
capacity, any assistance received from that authority shall be credited to the
alleviation obligation with respect to the project or the facilities providing
additional project capacity, as the case may be, in proportion to the
percentage of impact attributable to the project or facilities providing
additional project capacity, but in no event shall the candidate realize less
revenues than would have been realized without receipt of any assistance.
(3)  With respect to school districts the fee in lieu of ad valorem property
tax for the state minimum school program required to be paid by the project
entity or other public agency under Subsection 11-13-302(2)(b)(i) shall be
treated as a separate fee and does not affect any credits for alleviation
payments received by the school districts under Subsection 11-13-302(2)(b)(i),
or Sections 11-13-305 and 11-13-306.
